da: Varmeindstillinger: Høj; Lav; Medium; Andet
zh-CN: 加热设置: 高; 低; 媒介; 其他
sl-SI: Nastavitve gretja: Visoka; Nizka; Srednja; Drugo
it: Impostazioni di calore: Alto; Basso; Medio; Altro
hu: Fűtési beállítások: Magas; Alacsony; Közepes; Egyéb
el: Ρυθμίσεις θερμότητας: Υψηλή; Χαμηλή; Μέση; Άλλο
ko: 열 설정: 높음; 낮음; 매체; 기타
fi: Lämpöasetukset: Korkea; Matala; Keskimääräinen; Muu
lt-LT: Šilumos nuostatos: Didelis; Mažas; Vidutinis; Kita
nl: Warmte-instellingen: Hoog; Laag; Medium; Andere
ja: 熱の設定: 高; 低; 媒体; その他
es: Configuración de calor: Alto; Bajo; Medio; Otros
cs: Nastavení tepla: Vysoký; Nízký; Médium; Jiné
th: การตั้งค่าความร้อน: เอวสูง; ต่ำ; สื่อ; อื่นๆ
de: Wärmeeinstellungen: Hoch; Niedrig; Medium; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Postavke topline: Visoka; Niska; Srednja; Ostalo
sk-SK: Nastavenia teploty: Vysoký; Nízky; Stredný; Iné
pl: Ustawienia nagrzewania: Wysoki; Niski; Środek; Inne
pt-PT: Definições de aquecimento: Alto; Baixo; Médio; Outro
sv: Värmeinställningar: Hög; Låg; Medium; Övrigt
vi: Cài đặt mức nhiệt: Cao; Trễ; Vừa; Khác
ro-RO: Setări căldură: Ridicat; Redus; Mediu; Altele
ru: Регулировка нагрева: Высокий; Низкий; Средний; Другой
tr: Isı Ayarları: Yüksek; Düşük; Orta; Diğer
pt-BR: Configurações do aquecimento: Alta; Baixa; Médio; Outro
bg-BG: Настройки за топлината: Висока; Ниска; Средна; Други
fr: Paramètres de chaleur: Haute; Basse; Moyen; Autre
nb: Varmeinnstillinger: Høy; Lav; Middels; Annet
zh-TW: 熱度設定: 高; 低; 媒介; 其他
en: Heat settings: High; Low; Medium; Other